Tennessee statutes. Title 58 Military Affairs, Emergencies and Civil Defense
Part 1

War Records Bureau

58-4-101. Establishment and duties of bureau.

There is created in the military department a war records bureau, the duties of which shall be to compile and preserve the records of those Tennesseans who have served their state and nation in time of war, to correlate these records as to rank, organization and branch of service, and to furnish to each county in the state a complete list of the residents of that county participating in such war; provided, however, that it shall be the duty of such war records bureau to furnish to the department of veterans services, upon request of such department and without cost to the latter, any and all records which may be in the possession of the war records bureau.

Acts 1945, ch. 136, § 1; 1947, ch. 86, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 1012.6 (Williams, § 1012.8); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 249, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-801; Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

Cross-References. Records preserved and maintained by historical commission, § 4-11-109.

58-4-102. Personnel — Appropriations.

The adjutant general, with the approval of the governor, shall appoint such necessary personnel as may be needed to enable the war records bureau to function efficiently; the compensation of such personnel, to be fixed by the adjutant general, with the approval of the governor, shall be upon the same scale as paid for comparable services in other departments of the state. For the purpose of enabling the bureau to operate, there is appropriated the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) annually.

Acts 1945, ch. 136, § 2; 1947, ch. 86, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 1012.7 (Williams, § 1012.9); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-802.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

58-4-103. Request for redaction of social security number from official records.

Any veteran of the United States armed forces, or the veteran's surviving spouse, attorney-in-fact, personal representative or court appointed guardian, may request that the war records bureau redact from the official records that are maintained and distributed by the bureau the veteran's social security identification number from those military records if the records are stored in a manner that permits redaction.

The request for redaction of a social security identification number from a military record in the possession of the war records bureau shall be made on a paper writing in a form that is substantially similar to the form that is authorized for use under § 10-7-513. The commissioner of veterans services shall approve a form that meets the requirements of this subsection (b).

The war records bureau has no duty to inquire beyond the acknowledged request to verify the identity or authority of the person requesting the removal. Upon receiving the written request, the war records bureau shall act in accordance with the request to redact the social security identification number from a military record in the possession of the bureau. If redaction is requested and is not practicable, the war records bureau shall verbally or by writing explain to the person making the request why redaction is not practicable.

Acts 2009, ch. 219, § 1; 2015, ch. 24, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.